District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-101.04

Testing of Solid Waste Reduction Center Number 1 for compliance with certain emission standards; submission of test results and reports to Council.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 4, 32 DCR 562
Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 401, 61 DCR 6767

Cross References

Acid rain, research and plan, see 42 U.S.C. § 8901 et seq.
Air pollution prevention and control, Clean Air Act, see 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.
Clean Air Act, see 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.
Pollution Prevention Act of 1990, see 42 U.S.C. § 13101 et seq.
Stratospheric Ozone Protection, see 42 U.S.C. § 7671 et seq.
Sulfur dioxide, acid deposition control, air pollution prevention and control, see 42 U.S.C. § 7651 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-904.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Air Pollution Control Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-256, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2614).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Air Pollution Control Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-450, December 5, 1996, 43 DCR 6682), and § 2 of the Air Pollution Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-16, March 3, 1997, 44 DCR 1754).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 5-165, the District of Columbia Air Pollution Control Act of 1984, see Mayor’s Order 93-12, February 16, 1993.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 5-165, the “D.C. Air Pollution Control Act of 1984”, see Mayor’s Order 98-44, April

Editor's Notes

Air quality control regulations: D.C. Law 5-165, § 3, the “District of Columbia Air Pollution Control Act of 1984”, enacted the air quality control regulations of the District of Columbia as Title 20 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (20 DCMR Chapters 1-9).